Washington statutes.
RCW 18.28.140

Assignment of wages not prohibited.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as prohibiting the assignment of wages by a debtor to a debt adjuster, if such assignment is otherwise in accordance with the law of this state.

[ 1999 c 151 s 108; 1967 c 201 s 14.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Effective date—1999 c 151: See notes following RCW 18.28.010.